Utah statutes.
17B-1-645.   Residential fee credit.
(1)  A local district may create a fee structure under this title that
permits:
(a)  a home owner or residential tenant to file for a fee credit for a fee
charged by the local district, if the credit is based on:
(i)  the home owner's annual income; or
(ii)  the residential tenant's annual income; or
(b)  an owner of federally subsidized housing to file for a credit for a fee
charged by the local district.
(2)  If a local district permits a person to file for a fee credit under
Subsection (1)(a), the local district shall make the credit available to:
(a)  a home owner; and
(b)  a residential tenant.
